Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2492
Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers from the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund.

(2) The division shall use the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund as appropriated by the Legislature for local and state public-private partnerships for nonprofit and for-profit entities engaged in opioid use prevention and opioid treatment infrastructure projects as determined by the division, including capital construction and renovation. The administrative cost for distributing funds under this section shall not exceed an amount equal to five percent of the amount distributed.

(3) Any money in the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 12.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.